Louisiana, session 2026, SB383.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1514(B), (C)(1)(a), and (D)(4) and (11), 1536(E)(3), and
1553(B)(8) and (10) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1514. Worker training fund; purpose; training programs; eligibility criteria;
program administration
* * *
B. Incumbent Worker Training Account funds shall be used only for the
following types of training:
(1) Customized training. Designed to meet the special need and specific skill,
technology, or operational needs and requirements of business and industry,
including a small business employer or group of small business employers.
customized Customized training programs may include specialized, employer-
specific curriculums, instructional materials, training delivery methods, on-site or
employer-directed training, innovative training projects, and training locations.
Customized training may also include standardized courses. Customized training
shall address workforce challenges of the employer and be for workforce needs
such as process improvements, new equipment, or technology adoption. The
administrator shall define "customized training" through rulemaking
consistent with this Section.
(2) Small business employee training. This type of training is may be
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 383 ENROLLED
individual standardized (off-the-shelf) training, customized training, or college or
university noncredit courses and shall be available to businesses having fifty or
fewer employees.
(3) Preemployment training. This type of training shall be provided for
nonincumbent workers for new, existing, and expanding businesses. This training
may include screening, skills assessment, testing, remediation, and occupational and
technical training.
(4) Work-based learning. This type of training shall be provided for
apprenticeship and internship programs.
C. An applicant is eligible to participate in the Incumbent Worker Training
Program if it meets the following criteria:
(1) Is an individual employer or a consortium made up of two or more
eligible employers that meets all of the following requirements:
(a) Has been operating in Louisiana this state for not less than three years a
minimum of two years, unless otherwise exempted by the secretary of Louisiana
Works or his designee.
* * *
D.(1) * * *
(4)(a) No more than ten percent of such amounts appropriated to the fund by
the state legislature shall be used for the payment of expenses incurred for the
administration of this account.
(b) No more than forty percent of such amounts appropriated to the fund
by the state legislature shall be used for sector-based training, regional
workforce initiatives, or innovation or pilot projects addressing high-demand
or shortage occupations.
* * *
(11) The administrator shall administer the account and shall promulgate
rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act for the
administration of this Section, including the procedures for applying for funds,
distribution of funds, monitoring of and auditing of training conducted with funds,
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 383 ENROLLED
reimbursement of costs, the definition and implementation of "customized
training", and any additional requirements he deems appropriate and necessary to
carry out the provisions of this Section.
* * *
§1536. Determination of rate; ratio of reserves to payroll as a basis
* * *
E.(1) * * *
(3) If, at the computation date in any year, the fund balance, including all
monies in the benefit transfer account, exceeds one billion four one hundred fifty
million dollars, a ten percent reduction in contributions due under the rate table
provided in Subsection D of this Section shall be granted to each employer with a
positive reserve ratio.
* * *
§1553. Noncharging of benefits; recoupment; social charge account; social charge
tax rate
* * *
B.(1) * * *
(8) Amounts not to exceed twenty million dollars to be credited to the
Incumbent Worker Training Account to fund the Incumbent Worker Training
Program as provided under R.S. 23:1514 shall be charged to this account only in any
calendar year in which the applied trust fund balance range as defined in R.S.
23:1474 is equal to or greater than seven hundred fifty million dollars, but less than
one billion two one hundred fifty million dollars and only in the amount necessary
to bring the balance of unobligated funds in such subaccount to twenty million
dollars.
* * *
(10) Amounts not to exceed thirty-five million dollars to be credited to the
Incumbent Worker Training Account to fund the Incumbent Worker Training
Program as provided under R.S. 23:1514 shall be charged to this account only in any
calendar year in which the applied trust fund balance range as defined in R.S.
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 383 ENROLLED
23:1474 is equal to or greater than one billion two one hundred fifty million dollars
and only in the amount necessary to bring the balance of unobligated funds in such
subaccount to thirty-five million dollars.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.